Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2031.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-276 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
276. (a) In order for a person to qualify as an instructor for a driving
school, such person shall meet the following requirements:
(a)(1) Present to the department evidence of:
(1)(A) Credit in driver education and safety from an accredited
college or university equivalent to credits in those subjects required of
instructors in the schools accredited by the state board;
(2)(B) having a valid credential issued by the state board to teach
driver education; or
(3)(C) having completed at least 30 hours of classroom and 24
hours of behind the wheel training under the direct supervision of an
individual who is presently licensed as an instructor by the state board
under paragraph (1) subparagraph (A) or (2) (B) and who has been
continuously licensed and who has actively instructed students for a
period of at least three years;
(b)(2) have knowledge of the Kansas operation lifesaver
highway/railroad grade crossing safety program;
(c)(3) be physically able to operate safely a motor vehicle and to
train others in the operation of motor vehicles;
(d)(4) provide a certificate of health from a medical doctor stating
that such person is physically and mentally able to safely operate a
motor vehicle;
(e)(5) hold a valid Kansas drivers' driver's license or driver's
license issued by any other state; and
(f)(6) pay to the department an application fee of $5.
(b) For a motorcycle instructor subject to the provisions of this
section, such motorcycle instructor shall be required to:
(1) Have successfully completed all requirements of this section;
and
(2) possess a valid class M driver's license or equivalent license
allowing such individual to operate a motorcycle for another state.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-276 is hereby repealed.

HOUSE BILL No. 2031—page 2
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
Governor.